District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “1333 M Street, SE Tax Abatement Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 46 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-4682. 1333 M Street, SE development project tax abatement.”.
(b) A new section 47-4682 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-4682. 1333 M Street, SE development project tax abatement.
“(a) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Developer” means FRF Land Owner LLC, its successors, affiliates, and
assigns.
“(2) “Inclusionary Units” means a unit set aside for sale or rental to eligible
households as required by the Inclusionary Zoning Program or established by an order approving
a Planned Unit Development pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 11-X of the District of Columbia
Municipal Regulations.
“(3) “Orders” means Z.C. Order No. 20-06, effective April 23, 2021, as amended
and extended pursuant to Z.C. Order No. 20-06A, effective September 8, 2022, Z.C. Order No.
20-06B, effective April 7, 2023, and Z.C. Order No. 20-06C, effective April 28, 2023.
“(4) “Project” means the Planned Unit Development (“PUD”) approved by the
Zoning Commission of the District of Columbia pursuant to the Orders.
“(5) “Property” means the real property, including any improvements thereon,
located at 1333 M Street, SE, known for tax assessment purposes as Lot 2, Square 1048, Suffix-
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
S, or as the land for such lots may be subdivided into record lots, assessment and taxation lots,
condominium lots, air rights lots, or any combination in the future.
“(b) Subject to subsections (c) and (d) of this section, for the 15 consecutive tax years
beginning on October 1, 2029, the Property shall be allowed an annual real property tax abatement
equal to the amount of the real property taxes assessed and imposed by Chapter 8 of this title, in
excess of any amount over $150,000 per year.
“(c) The Property shall be eligible for the abatement authorized in subsection (b) of this
section in each tax year that Mayor determines that the Developer has met the following
conditions, consistent, as applicable, with the terms established under the Orders:
“(1) To the extent constructed, the Developer has reserved a minimum of 12% of
the residential gross floor area of the Project as inclusionary units for households earning equal
to or less than 60% of the median family income (“MFI”), including 3 of the 6 two-bedroom
inclusionary units in the East Tower for households earning equal to or less than 50% of the MFI;
“(2) The Developer has constructed or is in the process of constructing each of the
following public space improvements that provide benefits of special value to the neighborhood:
“(A) A neighborhood greenway on Water Street, SE, between 12th
and M Streets, SE;
“(B) The Arrival Plaza, Waterfront Plaza, 14th Street Corridor
Plaza, and Lower Retail Promenade;
“(C) A reconstructed Anacostia Bicycle Trail on M Street, SE;
“(D) A reconstructed Virginia Avenue, SE with bioretention
facilities; and
“(E) The installation of 52 short-term bicycle spaces in public
space on M Street and Virginia Avenue, SE;
“(3) The Developer has provided a one-time monetary contribution in the amount
of $25,000 to the Department of Parks and Recreation to support the programming for seniors at
the Arthur Capper Recreation Center; and
“(4) The Developer has provided a one-time monetary contribution in the amount
of $25,000 to the Seafarer’s Yacht Club, located in Washington, DC to support the operations and
preservation of the Yacht Club.
“(d)(1) By October 31 of each tax year commencing on or after October 1, 2029, the
Developer shall provide to the Mayor information with respect to each of the conditions provided
in subsection (c) of this section sufficient to enable the Mayor to determine whether each such
condition has been satisfied.
“(2) By December 31 of the tax year, the Mayor shall determine whether the
Property is eligible for the abatement provided in subsection (b) of this section for that tax year
and shall so certify to the Office of Tax and Revenue (“OTR”). The Mayor’s certification shall
include:
“(A) The Developer’s taxpayer identification number;
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) A description of the eligible Property, by street address and square, lot,
parcel, or reservation number, including the number of floors, location, and square footage;
“(C) A statement as to whether the Developer has satisfied the conditions
enumerated in subsection (c) of this section; and
“(D) Any other information that OTR considers necessary or appropriate.
“(3) If at any time, the Mayor determines that the Property has become ineligible
for the abatement provided pursuant to this section, the Mayor shall notify OTR of the Property’s
ineligibility and shall specify the date that the Property became ineligible.
“(e) If the Property is eligible for the tax abatement provided pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section, OTR shall process the abatement before the first semi-annual billing of the tax year.
“(f) The real property tax abatement provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from any other source
applicable to the Project or the Property.
“(g) This section shall not prevent or restrict the Developer from utilizing any other tax,
development, or other economic development incentives available to the Project or the Property.
“(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the owner of the Property from
appealing or contesting its real estate tax assessment.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4